sv: Elektroterapimetod: Kombination; EMS; Värme; IFC; IFT; Massage; Mikroström; NMES; Rysk ström; TENS; Övrigt
tr: Elektroterapi modalitesi: Kombine; EMS; Isı; IFC; IFT; Masaj; Mikroakım; NMES; Rus akımı; TENS; Diğer
el: Μέθοδος ηλεκτροθεραπείας: Συνδυαστική; EMS; Θερμότητα; IFC; IFT; Μασάζ; Μικρορεύμα; NMES; Ρωσικό ρεύμα; TENS; Άλλο
es: Modalidad de electroterapia: Combinación; EMS; Calor; IFC; IFT; Masaje; Microcorriente; NMES; Corriente rusa; TENS; Otros
da: Elektroterapimodalitet: Kombineret; EMS; Varme; IFC; IFT; Massage; Mikrostrøm; NMES; Russisk strøm; TENS; Andet
vi: Phương thức điện trị liệu: Hỗn hợp; EMS; Nhiệt; IFC; IFT; Mát xa; Vi dòng điện; NMES; Dòng điện Nga; TENS; Khác
pt-BR: Modalidade de eletroterapia: Combinação; EMS; Calor; IFC; IFT; Massagem; Microcorrente; NMES; Corrente russa; TENS; Outro
zh-CN: 电疗模式: 组合; 肌肉电刺激; 加热; 干扰电流; 干扰波治疗; 按摩; 微电流; 神经肌肉电刺激; 俄罗斯电流; 经皮神经电刺激; 其他
ru: Модальность электротерапии: Комбинированные; ЭМС; Нагрев; ИФТ; ИФТ; Для массажа; Микротоковая; НМЭС; Русский ток; ЧЭНС; Другой
it: Modalità di elettroterapia: Mista; EMS; Calore; IFC; IFT; Massaggio; Microcorrente; NMES; Corrente russa; TENS; Altro
hu: Elektroterápiás modalitás: Kombinált; EMS; Hő; IFC; IFT; Masszázs; Mikroáram; NMES; Orosz áram; TENS; Egyéb
sk-SK: Modalita elektroterapie: Kombinácia; EMS; Teplo; IFC; IFT; Masážny; Mikroprúd; NMES; Ruský prúd; TENS; Iné
pl: Tryb elektroterapii: Kombinacja; EMS; Ciepło; IFC; IFT; Masaż; Mikroprąd; NMES; Prąd rosyjski; TENS; Inne
hr-HR: Modalitet elektroterapije: Kombinirana; EMS; Toplina; IFC; IFT; Masaža; Mikrostruja; NMES; Ruska struja; TENS; Ostalo
lt-LT: Elektroterapijos metodas: Mišrus; EMS; Šiluma; IFC; IFT; Masažinis; Mikrosrovė; NMES; Rusiška srovė; TENS; Kita
en: Electrotherapy modality: Combination; EMS; Heat; IFC; IFT; Massage; Microcurrent; NMES; Russian current; TENS; Other
de: Elektrotherapiemodalität: Kombination; EMS; Hitze; IFC; IFT; Massage; Mikrostrom; NMES; Russischer Strom; TENS; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Модалност на електротерапията: Комбинация; ЕМС; Топлина; ИФТ; ИФТ; Масаж; Микроток; НМЕС; Руски ток; ТЕНС; Други
ro-RO: Modalitate de electroterapie: Combinată; EMS; Căldură; IFC; IFT; Masaj; Microcurent; NMES; Curent rusesc; TENS; Altele
fi: Sähköterapian muoto: Yhdistelmä; EMS; Lämpö; IFC; IFT; Hieronta; Mikrovirta; NMES; Venäläinen virta; TENS; Muu
ja: 電気療法モダリティ: 混合タイプ; EMS; ヒート; IFC; IFT; マッサージ; マイクロカレント; NMES; ロシアンカレント; TENS; その他
zh-TW: 電療模式: 組合; 肌肉電刺激; 加熱; 干擾波治療; 干擾波療法; 按摩; 微電流; 神經肌肉電刺激; 俄式電流; 經皮神經電刺激; 其他
pt-PT: Modalidade de eletroterapia: Mista; EMS; Calor; IFC; IFT; Massagem; Microcorrente; NMES; Corrente russa; TENS; Outro
cs: Modalita elektroterapie: Kombinace; EMS; Teplo; IFC; IFT; Masážní; Mikroproud; NMES; Ruský proud; TENS; Jiné
th: วิธีการรักษาด้วยไฟฟ้า: ผมแบบผสม; อีเอ็มเอส; ความร้อน; ไอเอฟซี; ไอเอฟที; การนวด; กระแสไฟฟ้าระดับไมโคร; เอ็นเอ็มอีเอส; กระแสไฟฟ้าแบบรัสเซีย; เทนส์; อื่นๆ
nl: Elektrotherapiemodaliteit: Combinatie; EMS; Warmte; IFC; IFT; Massage; Microstroom; NMES; Russische stroom; TENS; Andere
fr: Modalité d’électrothérapie: Mixte; EMS; Chaleur; IFC; IFT; Massage; Microcourant; NMES; Courant russe; TENS; Autre
sl-SI: Modalnost elektroterapije: Kombinacija; EMS; Toplota; IFC; IFT; Masaža; Mikrotok; NMES; Ruski tok; TENS; Drugo
ko: 전기 치료 방식: 복합; EMS; 열; IFC; IFT; 마사지; 미세전류; NMES; 러시아 전류; TENS; 기타
nb: Elektroterapimodalitet: Kombinasjon; EMS; Varme; IFC; IFT; Massasje; Mikrostrøm; NMES; Russisk strøm; TENS; Annet